Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Purposes and Powers of Nonprofit Corporations

48-53-101. Purposes.

Every corporation incorporated under chapters 51-68 of this title has the purpose of engaging in any lawful business unless a more limited purpose is set forth in the charter.

A corporation engaging in an activity that is subject to regulation under another statute of this state may incorporate under chapters 51-68 of this title only if permitted by, and subject to all limitations of, the other statute.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 3.01.

Cross-References. Application of nonprofit corporation law, title 48, chs. 51-67, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, § 48-68-101.

Business corporations, purposes and powers, title 48, ch. 13.

48-53-102. General powers.

Unless its charter provides otherwise, every corporation has perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name and has the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its affairs, including, without limitation, power to:

Sue and be sued, complain, and defend in its corporate name;

Have a corporate seal, which may be altered at will, and to use it, or a facsimile of it, by impressing or affixing it or in any other manner reproducing it;

Make and amend bylaws, not inconsistent with its charter or with the laws of this state, for regulating and managing the affairs of the corporation;

Purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, and own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal with, real or personal property, or any legal or equitable interest in property, wherever located;

Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, and otherwise dispose of, or grant a security interest in, all or any part of its property;

Purchase, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire; own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, or grant a security interest in; and deal in and with shares of other interests in, or obligations of, any other entity;

Make contracts and guarantees, incur liabilities, borrow money, issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations, (which may be convertible into or include the option to purchase other securities of the corporation), and secure any of its obligations or those of any other person by mortgage, pledge of, or security interest in, any of its property, franchises, or income;

Lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and receive and hold real and personal property as security for repayment;

Be a promoter, partner, member, associate, or manager of any partnership, joint venture, trust, or other entity;

Conduct its activities, locate offices, and exercise the powers granted by chapters 51-68 of this title within or without this state;

Elect, appoint, and designate directors and appoint officers, employees, and agents of the corporation, define their duties, and fix their compensation;

Pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit sharing plans, and benefit or incentive plans for any or all of the current or former directors, officers, employees, and agents;

Make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific, or educational purposes;

Make payments or donations, or do any other act, not inconsistent with law, that furthers the corporate interest;

Accept gifts, devises, and bequests subject to any conditions or limitations contained in such gift, devise, or bequest, so long as such conditions or limitations are not contrary to chapters 51-68 of this title or the purposes for which the corporation is organized;

Impose dues, assessments, admission, service and transfer fees upon its members;

Establish conditions for admission to membership, admit members, and issue memberships;

Carry on a business; and

Do all things necessary or convenient, not inconsistent with law, to further the activities and affairs of the corporation.

A nonprofit corporation shall not have or issue shares of stock.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 3.02.

Cross-References. Authentication of corporate instruments, § 66-22-108.

Ownership and conveyance of land by religious societies, title 66, ch. 2, part 2.

Law Reviews.

Conversions of Nonprofit Hospitals to For-Profit Status: The Tennessee Experience, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1077 (1998).

Attorney General Opinions. Domestic nonprofit water cooperative merging with or transferring assets to municipality, OAG 06-176, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 196 (12/19/06).

48-53-103. Emergency powers.

In anticipation of or during an emergency, the board of directors of a corporation may:

Modify lines of succession to accommodate the incapacity of any director, officer, employee or agent; and

Relocate the principal office, designate alternative principal offices or regional offices, or authorize the officers to do so.

During an emergency, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise:

Notice of a meeting of the board of directors need be given only to those directors whom it is practicable to reach and may be given in any practicable manner, including by publication and radio; and

One (1) or more officers of the corporation present at a meeting of the board of directors may be deemed to be directors for the meeting, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, as necessary to achieve a quorum.

Corporate action taken in good faith during an emergency under this section to further the ordinary affairs of the corporation:

Binds the corporation; and

May not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee, or agent.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 3.03.

48-53-104. Ultra vires actions.

Except as provided in subsection (b), the validity of corporate action may not be challenged on the ground that the corporation lacks or lacked power to act.

A corporation's power to act may be challenged in a proceeding against the corporation to enjoin an act where a third party has not acquired rights. The proceedings may be brought by the attorney general and reporter, a director, or by a member or members in a derivative proceeding.

A corporation's power to act may be challenged in a proceeding against an incumbent or former director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation. The proceeding may be brought by a director, the attorney general and reporter, or the corporation, directly, derivatively, or through a receiver, a trustee or other legal representative.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 3.04.

Cross-References. For-profit business corporations, Ultra vires actions, § 48-13-104.

Limited liability companies, Ultra vires actions, § 48-213-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, §§ 72, 86.